Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8386.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-18 of the General Laws entitled "Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-18-63. Receipt for cash payment of rent.
A landlord shall provide a receipt to any tenant that makes a rental payment in cash at the
time the payment is received.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006199
========